California statutes. Insurance Code
(e) Shall have authority to transfer to a trustee or trustees, under a voting trust agreement, the stock of an insurer heretofore or hereafter issued to the commissioner as conservator or as liquidator in connection with a rehabilitation or reinsurance agreement, or any other proceeding under this article. This voting trust agreement shall confer upon the trustee or trustees the right to vote or otherwise represent that stock, and shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than 21 years.

(f) May,
 for the purpose of executing and performing any of the powers and authority conferred upon the commissioner under this article, in the name of the person affected by the proceeding or in the commissioner’s own name, prosecute and defend any and all suits and other legal proceedings, and execute, acknowledge and deliver any and all deeds, assignments, releases and other instruments necessary and proper to effectuate any sale of any real and personal property or other transaction in connection with the administration, liquidation, or other disposition of the assets of the person affected by that proceeding; and any deed or other instrument executed pursuant to the authority hereby given shall be valid and effectual for all purposes as though it had been executed by the person affected by any proceeding under this article or by its officers pursuant to the direction of its governing board or authority. In cases where any real property sold by the commissioner under this article is located in a county other than
 the county wherein the proceeding is pending, the commissioner shall cause a certified copy of the order of his or her appointment, or order authorizing or ratifying the sale, to be filed in the office of the county recorder of the county in which that property is located.

(g) Shall have authority to invest and reinvest, in such manner as the commissioner may deem suitable for the best interests of the creditors of that person, such portions of the funds and assets of that person in his or her possession as do not exceed the amount of the reserves required by law to be maintained by that person as reserves for life insurance policies, annuity contracts, supplementary agreements incidental to life business, and reserves for noncancellable disability policies, and which funds and assets are not immediately distributable to creditors. However, no investment or reinvestment shall be made which exceeds the sum of one hundred thousand dollars
 ($100,000) without first obtaining permission of the court, and then only in accordance with any terms that court may prescribe. That permission shall not be required for any investment or reinvestment of those funds or assets in funds administered by the Treasurer.

The enumeration, in this article, of the duties, powers and authority of the commissioner in proceedings under this article shall not be construed as a limitation upon the commissioner, nor shall it exclude in any manner his or her right to perform and to do such other acts not herein specifically enumerated, or otherwise provided for, which the commissioner may deem necessary or expedient for the accomplishment or in aid of the purpose of such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.

Any application under section 1011 or 1016 shall be served upon the person named in such application in the manner prescribed by law for personal service of summons or as provided by section 1039.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1039.

In lieu of the service required by section 1038, service may, upon application to said court, be made in such manner as the court directs whenever it is satisfactorily shown by affidavit (a) in the case of a corporation, that the officers of the corporation upon whom service is required to be made as above provided, have departed from the State or keep themselves concealed therein with intent to avoid the service, or, (b) in the case of a Lloyd’s association or interinsurance exchange, that the individual attorney in fact or the officers of the corporate attorney in fact can not be served because of such departure or concealment, or, (c) in the case of a natural person, that
 the natural person upon whom service is required to be made as above provided, has departed from the State or keeps himself concealed therein with intent to avoid the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1040.

At any time after an order is made under section 1011 or 1016, the commissioner may remove the principal office of the person proceeded against to the City and County of San Francisco or to the city of Los Angeles. In event of such removal, the court wherein the proceeding was commenced shall, upon the application of the commissioner, direct its clerk to transmit all of the papers filed therein with such clerk to the clerk of the City and County of San Francisco or of the county of Los Angeles as the case may require. The proceeding shall thereafter be conducted in the same manner as though it had been commenced in the county to which it had been
 transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

The commissioner shall be the custodian of all moneys collected by him or her or coming into his or her possession in the course of any proceeding under this article, but the commissioner may deposit those moneys, or any part thereof, without court approval in a bank which is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), so long as the total deposit did not exceed those federal insurance limits; in a centralized State Treasury system bank account; or in funds administered by the Treasurer.

Provided further, any money which is deposited by the commissioner pursuant to this section, which the
 commissioner determines is available for investment, may be invested or reinvested by the Treasurer in any of the securities which are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a bank as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury. Any increment which is received from that investment or reinvestment or deposit shall be remitted to the commissioner for allocation, upon a proper and equitable basis, to each estate participating in the investment, reinvestment, or deposit and deposited and disbursed as provided in Section 1037. The Treasurer may deduct from that remittance an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred in carrying out this section or may bill the commissioner for those costs and the commissioner shall pay those costs from money which is collected pursuant to this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 356, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

The commissioner and a special deputy commissioner appointed pursuant to section 1035 shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and examine them under oath upon any subject relating to the affairs and business of any person affected by proceedings under this article. The penalties provided in Chapter II, Title III, Part IV of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to any witness who fails or refuses to appear in accordance with such subpoena, or to testify in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

In any proceeding under this article, the commissioner, as conservator or as liquidator, may, subject to the approval of said court, and subject to such liens as may be necessary mutualize or reinsure the business of such person, or enter into rehabilitation agreements. No commissioner who acts as conservator of such person or who mutualizes, merges or reinsures the business of such person or who
 enters into rehabilitation agreements affecting such person, and no deputy commissioner who has participated in the administration of the affairs of such person for the commissioner as conservator shall for a period of two years from and after the effective date of such mutualization, reinsurance or rehabilitation become an officer or director of, or serve as an officer or director of, or serve in any position of gain or profit in, any company formed in whole or in part of the assets or funds, or any part of the assets or funds of such mutualized, merged, reinsured or rehabilitated person.

Every person violating this provision is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

Such rehabilitation or
 reinsurance agreements shall provide that, subsequent to the date thereof and for such period of time as the commissioner may determine, no investment or reinvestment of the assets of the person rehabilitated or reinsured shall be made without first obtaining the written approval of the commissioner.

Every party to such agreement, and every director, officer, agent and employee of such person, and every other person who knowingly in violation thereof directs or aids or assists in causing to be made an investment or reinvestment of any of said assets without first having obtained the written approval of the commissioner, or who makes such investment or reinvestment in nonconformity with the written approval of the commissioner then in effect authorizing such investment or reinvestment, is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail or by a fine not exceeding ten
 thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 208.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

In connection with a rehabilitation agreement under section 1043, which affects a life insurer, and in an agreement made for the reinsurance of the business of a life insurer under said section, there may be included in such rehabilitation or reinsurance agreement a provision for, and the commissioner shall have authority to impose and declare, a moratorium against the provisions of the life insurance policies therein involved calling for the making of loans on the security of such policies and for the payment of money upon the surrender of such policies, such moratorium to continue for such period and to such extent as may be directed by said court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

If at any time after the issuance of an order under section 1011 affecting a life insurer issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis and organized with a capital stock evidenced by shares thereof it shall appear to the commissioner that the purposes of section 1011 can be best attained by the mutualization of such life insurer, the commissioner may formulate a plan for the mutualization of such insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

Said mutualization plan shall include provisions for:

(a) The acquisition by such insurer of all outstanding shares of its capital stock at a price and upon terms and conditions to be fixed as hereinafter provided.

(b) The retirement of said shares of stock when acquired by such insurer.

(c) The amendment of the charter of such insurer so as to enable it to transact its business as a mutual insurer issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis.

(d) The manner in which and the time within which, after mutualization is effected, matured and maturing claims against such insurer shall be paid to the lawful holders thereof.

(e) The submission of said mutualization plan to the policyholders of such insurer under such procedure as shall be set forth in the plan or prescribed by said court, for their approval or rejection.

(f) Notice to the shareholders of such insurer, in such manner and at such time after the approval of said mutualization plan by said policyholders, as the court may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

Said mutualization plan may include provisions:

(a) Imposing a moratorium against the provisions of the life insurance policies issued by such insurer and then in force calling for the making of loans on the security of such policies and for the payment of money upon the surrender of such policies, for a period and to an extent to be named in such provisions imposing such moratorium, and subject to extension, change or prior termination only upon the written approval of the commissioner.

(b) Imposing liens upon, or otherwise adjusting, the policies
 of the insurer so as to create or make available the minimum paid-in capital required of such an insurer to be admitted and such additional paid-in capital as will be reasonably sufficient to enable such insurer to carry on its business.

No lien or adjustment of such insurer’s policies shall be made or imposed which has the effect of creating or making available for distribution to the shareholders of such insurer assets otherwise unavailable therefor.

(c) Regulating and adjusting the respective rights of holders of policies of different classes to participate in the profits or savings which may be made by such insurer when mutualized.

(d) Regulating the manner in which and the time at which the shareholders of such insurer shall be compensated for their proprietary interest, then existing, in the assets of such insurer other than
 goodwill.

(e) Regulating the manner in which the shareholders of such insurer shall be compensated for their proprietary interest in the goodwill, if then existing, of such insurer; provided, however, that no shareholder shall be compensated for his proprietary interest in such goodwill while any moratorium imposed under subdivision (a) of this section is in effect, nor while any lien imposed under subdivision (b) of this section exists, nor until all other indebtedness of such insurer existing at the time of mutualization has been fully paid and discharged or full provision made for its payment, nor otherwise than out of surplus earnings.

(f) Regulating such other matters as may, in the opinion of the commissioner, require regulation in the interest of expediency or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 932.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

Upon formulation of said mutualization plan the commissioner shall submit the same to said court with his application for an order of said court directing the commissioner to submit said mutualization plan to the persons named in subdivision (e) of section 1046, under such procedure as shall be set forth in the plan or prescribed by said court, for their approval or rejection, and the court shall issue such order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.

Each policyholder of such insurer shall be entitled to one vote, regardless of the amount for which, or the number of policies under which, he is insured. Such mutualization plan shall be deemed approved by the said policyholders if a majority of the policyholders voting for and against it shall have approved it, and shall be deemed rejected if a majority of the policyholders voting for and against it shall have rejected it. In the event that said plan of mutualization is rejected by the policyholders of such insurer, the commissioner shall certify the fact of such rejection to said court, whereupon he may proceed further as hereinbefore provided in this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

In the event that said plan of mutualization is approved by said policyholders, the commissioner shall certify to the said court the fact of such approval and the number of votes cast for and against such mutualization plan. Said court shall thereupon issue its order directing the commissioner to give notice, as provided in said mutualization plan or as the court may otherwise prescribe, to the shareholders of such insurer of the approval of said mutualization plan by said policyholders. Said order shall direct the commissioner to transmit to each such shareholder by mail addressed to his address as it appears upon the records of such insurer, a true copy of said order and of
 said mutualization plan approved by said policyholders, and shall fix a time, not less than thirty nor more than sixty days from the date of such order, within which any such shareholder may file with said court a petition for the disapproval of said mutualization plan or for its modification in such manner as shall be set forth in such petition, and within which any such shareholder and the commissioner may file with said court a petition for the appointment of one or more appraisers to appraise the value of the then outstanding shares of capital stock of such insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

After the expiration of the time fixed in the order provided for in section 1050, and upon the filing of such petition, said court shall direct notice of a hearing of said petitions to be given to the commissioner and to such petitioners as are shareholders of such insurer. At such hearing, all petitions for the disapproval and all petitions for the modification of said mutualization plan shall be given precedence over all petitions for the appointment of one or more appraisers. Upon hearing of all such petitions for the disapproval and for the modification of said mutualization plan, said court shall either approve said mutualization plan or disapprove it or modify it in such
 manner and to such extent, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, as to said court shall seem appropriate. In the event of the disapproval of said mutualization plan the court shall deny all petitions for the appointment of one or more appraisers. In the event of the approval or modification of said mutualization plan, the court shall, upon hearing of the petitions for the appointment of appraisers, appoint one or more appraisers, who shall appraise the then outstanding shares of the capital stock of such insurer, without regard to any appreciation or depreciation arising out of said mutualization plan as so approved or modified. Such appraisement shall fix the reasonable value of such shares of capital stock, including the goodwill, if any, of such insurer, and shall state the value, if any, assigned to such goodwill; and if the appraisers shall have found that such insurer has no goodwill, such finding shall be stated. Such appraisement, when confirmed by said court, shall be final and
 conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

Thereupon the commissioner shall:

(a) Pay to each of such shareholders or his assignee or nominee, upon surrender of the shares held by such shareholder, the value of said shares so ascertained; subject, however, to the restrictions of subdivisions (d) and (e) of section 1047, and subject, also, to the terms and conditions of the mutualization plan as approved or modified.

(b) Appoint, with the approval of the court, the requisite number of directors in whom shall thereafter be vested the control and management of the assets and business of such
 insurer until their successors shall have been elected and qualified.

(c) Transfer, upon the order of said court, to the appropriate officers appointed by such directors, the property, real and personal, and the books, records, accounts and papers of such insurer; provided, however, that the commissioner may retain, as a deposit, so much of such property as he deems necessary to defray additional costs and expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with any proceeding under this article affecting such property or business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

Immediately upon the appointment of the directors as provided in subdivision (b) of section 1052, the directors theretofore holding office shall cease to hold office, and all rights of the shareholders of such insurer to vote at any meeting of such insurer shall absolutely cease and such shareholders shall retain only such interest in such corporation or in the property or assets thereof as shall be provided in said mutualization plan, and such insurer shall thereupon be and become a mutual life insurer under such corporate name as may have been set forth in its charter, as amended, to be conducted not for profit, but solely for the mutual benefit, ratably, of all its
 policyholders, and shall, upon issuance to it by the commissioner of a certificate of authority, have power to issue nonassessable policies on a reserve basis subject to all provisions of law applicable to incorporated life insurers issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis, but shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 7, Part 2, Division 2 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

Such insurer, after mutualization, shall be a continuation of the original insurer, and such mutualization shall not affect existing suits, rights or contracts except as provided in said mutualization plan as approved. Such insurer, after mutualization, shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties conferred or imposed by law upon insurers writing the classes of insurance written by it, and to protect rights and contracts existing prior to mutualization, subject to the effect of said mutualization plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

The commissioner shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties, concerning any insurer so mutualized, that are applicable to domestic insurers issuing policies of the same class. He shall issue a certificate of authority to transact the proper classes of insurance in this State to any insurer so mutualized which is solvent under Article 13, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 of this code and which has fully complied with the laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

All costs and expenses connected with proceedings for the mutualization of such insurer shall be paid by the commissioner out of the funds of such insurer, whether or not mutualized, subject to the approval of said court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.5.

Whenever money or other property is payable to any claimant out of the assets of any person under the provisions of Sections 1021 to 1033, but such person cannot be located or for any other reason the payment of such money or other property to such person cannot be made, although assets are available for such payment, such money or other property shall be deposited in the State Treasury by the commissioner. Such deposits shall be deemed to have been received under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and shall be subject to claim or other disposition as provided in said Chapter 7 (commencing with
 Section 1500) of Title 10. The commissioner may pay over the money or other property held by him to the persons respectively entitled thereto at any time prior to such deposit, upon being furnished satisfactory evidence of their right to the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1762.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

In all proceedings under this article, the commissioner shall be deemed to be a trustee for the benefit of all creditors and other persons interested in the estate of the person against whom the proceedings are pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

In any proceeding pending under the provisions of this article, the court in which such proceeding is pending shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine, in such proceeding, all actions or proceedings then pending or thereafter instituted by or against the person affected by a proceeding under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

1059.

The commissioner, in the performance of any of his duties under this article, shall be deemed to be a public officer acting in his official capacity on behalf of the State, and the provisions of Chapter 2, Division 7, Title 1 of the Government Code shall apply to him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

1060.

The commissioner shall transmit all of the following to the Governor, the Legislature, and to the committees of the Senate and Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance in the annual report submitted pursuant to Section 12922:

(a) The names of the persons proceeded against under this article.

(b) Whether such persons have resumed business or have been liquidated or have been mutualized.

(c) Such other facts on the operations of the Conservation & Liquidation Office as will acquaint the Governor, the policyholders, creditors, shareholders and the public with his or her proceedings under this article, including, but not limited to:

(1) An itemization of the number of staff, total salaries of staff, a description of the compensation methodology, and an organizational flowchart.

(2) Annual operating goals and results.

(3) A summary of all Conservation and Liquidation Office costs, including an itemization of internal and external costs, and a description of the methodology used to allocate those costs among insurer estates.

(4) A list of all current insolvencies not closed
 within ten years of a court ordered liquidation, and a narrative explaining why each insolvency remains open.

(5) An accounting of total claims by estate.

(6) A list of current year and cumulative distributions by class of creditor for each estate.

(7) For each proceeding, the net value of the estate at the time of conservation or liquidation and the net value at the end of the preceding calendar year.

(d) Other facts on the operations of the individual estates as will acquaint the Governor, Legislature, policyholders, creditors, shareholders, and the public with his or her proceedings under this article, including, but not limited to:

(1) The annual operating goals and results.

(2) The status of the conservation and liquidation process.

(3) Financial statements, including current and cumulative distributions, comparing current calendar year to prior year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 751, Sec. 58.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

In verification of the matters set forth in Section 1060 of this code, the Department of Finance shall, at least every two years or more often if requested by the commissioner, examine the commissioner’s books and accounts relating to all proceedings under this article, and shall file a report of each examination with the court in which the respective proceeding is pending and shall furnish the commissioner a certified copy of
 each report. The expense of examining the books and accounts of the commissioner as conservator or liquidator under this article shall be paid out of the support appropriation for the Department of Insurance current at the date of billing for the expense and shall, upon order of the court or courts before which the proceedings under the articles are pending, be ratably reimbursed to that appropriation out of the assets of the estates administered by the commissioner as conservator or liquidator under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 15.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.

In the event of the entry of an order under Section 1011 or 1016 of this article affecting any person having members, subscribers or policyholders, hereinafter referred to as “members” who are liable for assessment by law or by the provisions of their policies or contracts, and in which the termination of the policy or contract does not relieve the member from such liability, where the commissioner in his discretion decides that an assessment would be in order, the liability of such members shall be determined, and the assessment therefor levied in the following manner:

1. Within one year from the date of the
 entry of the order under the provisions of Section 1011 or 1016 of this article, the commissioner shall make a report to the court setting forth: (a) the reasonable value of the assets of such person; (b) its probable liabilities, including reasonable costs of liquidation; and (c) the probable necessary assessment, if any, to pay all claims in full.

2. Upon the basis of such report, including any amendments thereof, the court shall determine the basis for calculating the liability of each member, subscriber or policyholder and shall order the commissioner to determine the amount of liability of each of the members.

3. Thereafter the commissioner shall give notice to each member, subscriber or policyholder of the amount of his liability by inclosing notice thereof in a sealed envelope, addressed and mailed, postage prepaid, to each member, subscriber or policyholder at his last
 known address as the same appears upon the books of the insurer.

4. Not less than 20 days after the mailing of said notice, as provided in paragraph 3 of this section, the commissioner shall report to the court the names of the members, subscribers or policyholders who have failed to pay their assessment in accordance with said notice, whereupon the court shall issue an order directing each of said members, subscribers or policyholders to appear in said court and show cause in the proceedings pending against such person, why he should not be held liable to pay such assessment, and why the commissioner should not have judgment therefor.

5. The commissioner shall cause a notice of such order setting forth a brief summary of the contents thereof: (a) to be published in such manner as shall be directed by the court; and (b) to be inclosed in a sealed envelope, addressed and mailed by
 registered mail with return receipt requested, postage prepaid, to each of said members whose liability for assessment remains unpaid, at his last known address, at least 20 days before the return day of such order to show cause.

6. On the return day of such order to show cause, (a) if such member shall not appear and serve verified objections on the commissioner, the court shall make an order adjudicating that such member is liable for the amount of such assessment, and that the commissioner may have a judgment against such member therefor; (b) if such member shall appear and serve verified objections upon the commissioner, there shall be a full hearing before the court, and if the court affirms his liability to pay the whole or some part of said assessment, the commissioner may have judgment therefor.

7. A judgment upon any such order, shall have the same force and effect, and
 may be entered and may be appealed from as if it were a judgment in an original action brought in the court in which the proceeding is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.2. California Insurance Guarantee Association [1063. - 1063.19.]

1063.

(a) Within 60 days after the original effective date of this article, all insurers, including reciprocal insurers, admitted to transact insurance in this state of any or all of the following classes only in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Part 1 of this division: fire (see Section 102), marine (see Section 103), plate glass (see Section 107), liability (see Section 108), workers’ compensation (see Section 109), common carrier liability (see Section 110), boiler and machinery (see Section 111), burglary (see Section 112), sprinkler (see Section 114), team and vehicle (see Section 115), automobile (see Section 116), aircraft (see Section 118), and miscellaneous (see Section 120), shall establish the
 California Insurance Guarantee Association (the association); provided, however, this article shall not apply to the following classes or kinds of insurance: life and annuity (see Section 101), title (see Section 104), fidelity or surety including fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding obligations (see Section 105), disability or health (see Section 106), credit (see Section 113), mortgage guaranty, insolvency or legal (see Section 119), financial guaranty or other forms of insurance offering protection against investment risks (see Section 124), the ocean marine portion of any marine insurance or ocean marine coverage under any insurance policy including the following: the Jones Act (46 U.S.C. Sec. 688), the Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 901 et seq.), or any other similar federal statutory enactment, or any endorsement or policy affording protection and indemnity coverage, or reinsurance as defined in Section 620, or fraternal fire insurance written by associations
 organized and operating under Sections 9080 to 9103, inclusive. Any insurer admitted to transact only those classes or kinds of insurance excluded from this article shall not be a member insurer of the association. Each insurer admitted to transact a class of insurance included in this article, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, as a condition of its authority to transact insurance in this state, shall participate in the association whether established voluntarily or by order of the commissioner after the elapse of 60 days following the original effective date of this article in accordance with rules to be established as provided in this article. It shall be the purpose of the association to provide for each member insurer insolvency insurance as defined in Section 119.5.

(b) The association shall be managed by a board of governors, composed of nine member insurers, each of which shall be appointed by the commissioner to serve
 initially for terms of one, two, or three years and thereafter for three-year terms so that three terms shall expire each year on December 31, and shall continue in office until his or her successor shall be appointed and qualified. At least five members of the board shall be domestic insurers. At least three of the members shall be stock insurers, and at least three shall be nonstock insurers. The nine members shall be representative, as nearly as possible, of the classes of insurance and of the kinds of insurers covered by this article. In case of a vacancy for any reason on the board, the commissioner shall appoint a member insurer to fill the unexpired term. In addition to the nine member insurers, the membership of the board shall also include one public member appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate, one public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one business member appointed by the commissioner, and one labor member appointed by the commissioner.

(c) The association shall adopt a plan of operations, and any amendments thereto, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, necessary to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable manner of administering the association, and to provide for other matters as are necessary or advisable to implement the provisions of this article. The plan of operations and any amendments thereto shall be subject to prior written approval by the commissioner. All members of the association shall adhere to the plan of operation.

(d) If for any reason the association fails to adopt a suitable plan of operation within 90 days following the original effective date of this article, or if at any time thereafter the association fails to adopt suitable amendments to the plan of operation, the commissioner shall after hearing adopt and promulgate reasonable rules as are necessary or advisable to
 effectuate the provisions of this chapter. These rules shall continue in force until modified by the commissioner after hearing or superseded by a plan of operation, adopted by the association and approved by the commissioner.

(e) In accordance with its plan of operation, the association may designate one or more of its members as a servicing facility, but a member may decline this designation. Each servicing facility shall be reimbursed by the association for all reasonable expenses it incurs and for all payments it makes on behalf of the association. Each servicing facility shall have authority to perform any functions of the association that the board of governors lawfully may delegate to it and to do so on behalf of and in the name of the association. The designation of servicing facilities shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

(f) The association shall have
 authority to borrow funds when necessary to effectuate the provisions of this article, and may provide in its plan of operations for any of the following:

(1) The issuance of notes, bonds, or debentures, or the establishment of a special purpose trust or other entity, solely for the purpose of facilitating a financing.

(2) The securing of that borrowing or those notes, bonds, or debentures by pledging or granting liens or mortgages, or by otherwise encumbering its real or personal property, including, but not limited to, premiums levied under Section 1063.5.

(g) The association, either in its own name or through servicing facilities, may be sued and may use the courts to assert or defend any rights the association may have by virtue of this article as reasonably necessary to fully effectuate the provisions
 thereof.

(h) The association shall have the right to intervene as a party in any proceeding instituted pursuant to Section 1016 wherein liquidation of a member insurer as defined in Section 1063.1 is sought.

(i) (1) The association shall have an annual audit of its financial condition conducted by an independent certified public accountant. The audit shall be conducted, to the extent possible, in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards (GAAS) and the report of the audit shall be submitted to the commissioner.

(2) The association shall annually audit at least one-third of the service companies retained by the association to adjust claims of insolvent insurers. The audits shall (A) assure that all covered claims are being investigated, adjusted, and paid in accordance with customary